Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 4

Shares

45-4-401. Premiums for shares prohibited.

Credit union shares shall in no event be sold at a premium by any credit union to its members.

Acts 1931, ch. 67, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3849; Acts 1979, ch. 86, § 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1817.

45-4-402. Shares and deposits of minors.

Shares may be issued in the name of a minor and in trust in a way and manner that the bylaws may provide.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 16; Shan. Supp., § 2198a23; Code 1932, § 3850; Acts 1937, ch. 264, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 3850; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1818.

45-4-403. Transfer of shares.

Fully paid-up shares of a credit union may be transferred to any person upon election to membership, upon terms that the bylaws may provide.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 15; Shan. Supp., § 2168a22; Code 1932, § 3849; C. Supp. 1950, § 3849; Acts 1979, ch. 86, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1819.

45-4-404. Accounts in two or more names.

Investment or other deposit accounts maintained in any credit union in the names of two (2) or more persons shall be governed by §45-2-703.

Acts 1970, ch. 409, § 4; T.C.A., § 45-1834; Acts 1988, ch. 926, § 9.

45-4-405. Decedent shareholders or depositors.

Notwithstanding § 30-2-317, where no executor or administrator of a deceased shareholder or depositor has qualified and given notice of the qualifications of the executor or administrator to the credit union, it may, in its discretion and at any time after thirty (30) days from the death of the shareholder or depositor, pay out of all accounts or contents of safe deposit boxes maintained with it by the shareholder in an individual capacity all sums that do not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) in the aggregate:

To the executor named in any will known to the credit union; or

In the absence of knowledge of a purported will naming a surviving executor to:

A creditor for expenses of the funeral;

A creditor for the expenses of the last illness;

The surviving spouse; and

The next of kin; and

In the case of conflicting claims, the order of priority shall be that set out in subdivision (a)(2).

The receipt of any guardian, administrator or executor, duly appointed or qualified by the courts of this state or any other state, acknowledging the payment or transfer of funds, standing in the name of the person whose estate the fiduciary represents, in the form of shares or deposits in credit unions, shall be a good and sufficient acquittance for the payment or transfer and shall constitute a valid defense in favor of the credit unions against the demands or claims of all parties.

No credit union shall be liable for damages, penalty or tax by reason of any payment made pursuant to this section.

Acts 1986, ch. 558, § 3; 1988, ch. 926, § 10; 1995, ch. 177, § 14; 1997, ch. 426, § 22; 2017, ch. 190, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 26 provided that the amendments to this section by that act shall apply to all estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 1998 and to all wills, other documents and proceedings related thereto.

45-4-406. “Payable-on-death” share accounts and share deposits in trust — Powers of attorney.

The following provisions of chapter 2 of this title are applicable to credit unions:

Section 45-2-704 relating to contracts for “payable-on-death” share accounts and share deposits in trust;

Section 45-2-707 relating to powers of attorney; and

Sections 45-2-711 and 45-2-712 relating to payment of checks.

Acts 1991, ch. 118, § 1; 2014, ch. 597, § 4.